Idaho statutes. Title 50 MUNICIPAL CORPORATIONS
Chapter 20
URBAN RENEWAL LAW

Sec.

§ 50-2001. Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Idaho Urban Renewal Law of 1965”.

§ 50-2002. Findings and declarations of necessity.

It is hereby found and declared that there exist in municipalities of the state deteriorated and deteriorating areas (as herein defined) which constitute a serious and growing menace, injurious to the public health, safety, morals and welfare of the residents of the state; that the existence of such areas contributes substantially and increasingly to the spread of disease and crime, constitutes an economic and social liability imposing onerous municipal burdens which decrease the tax base and reduce tax revenues, substantially impairs or arrests the sound growth of municipalities, retards the provision of housing accommodations, aggravates traffic problems and substantially impairs or arrests the elimination of traffic hazards and the improvement of traffic facilities; and that the prevention and elimination of these conditions is a matter of state policy and state concern in order that the state and its municipalities shall not continue to be endangered by areas which are focal centers of disease, promote juvenile delinquency, and consume an excessive proportion of its revenue because of the extra services required for police, fire, accident, hospitalization and other forms of public protection, services and facilities.

It is further found and declared that certain of such areas, or portions thereof, may require acquisition, clearance, and disposition subject to use restrictions, as provided in this act, since the prevailing condition of decay may make impracticable the reclamation of the area by conservation or rehabilitation; that other areas or portions thereof may, through the means provided in this act, be susceptible of conservation or rehabilitation in such a manner that the conditions and evils hereinbefore enumerated may be eliminated, remedied or prevented; and that salvageable areas can be conserved and rehabilitated through appropriate public action as herein authorized, and the cooperation and voluntary action of the owners and tenants of property in such areas.

It is further found and declared that the powers conferred by this act are for public uses and purposes for which public money may be expended as herein provided and the power of eminent domain and police power exercised; and that the necessity in the public interest for the provisions herein enacted is hereby declared as a matter of legislative determination.

§ 50-2003. Encouragement of private enterprise.

An urban renewal agency, to the greatest extent it determines to be feasible in carrying out the provisions of this act, shall afford maximum opportunity, consistent with the sound needs of the municipality as a whole, to the rehabilitation or redevelopment of the urban renewal area by private enterprise. A municipality shall also give consideration to this objective in exercising its powers under this act, including the formulation of a workable program, the approval of urban renewal plans, community-wide plans or programs for urban renewal, and general neighborhood renewal plans (consistent with the general plan of the municipality), the exercise of its zoning powers, the enforcement of other laws, codes and regulations relating to the use of land and the use and occupancy of buildings and improvements, and the provision of necessary public improvements.

§ 50-2004. Workable program.

A municipality for the purposes of this act may formulate for the municipality a workable program for utilizing appropriate private and public resources to eliminate, and prevent the development or spread of, slums and urban blight, to encourage needed urban rehabilitation, or to undertake such of the aforesaid activities or other feasible municipal activities as may be suitably employed to achieve the objectives of such workable program. Such workable program may include, without limitation, provision for: the prevention of the spread of blight into areas of the municipality which are free from blight through diligent enforcement of housing, zoning and occupancy controls and standards; the rehabilitation or conservation of slum and blighted areas or portions thereof by replanning, removing congestion, providing parks, playgrounds and other public improvements, by encouraging voluntary rehabilitation and by compelling the repair and rehabilitation of deteriorated or deteriorating structures; and to cooperate with an urban renewal agency for the clearance and redevelopment of deteriorated or deteriorating areas or portions thereof.

§ 50-2005. Finding of necessity by local governing body.

No urban renewal agency and no municipality shall exercise the authority hereafter conferred by this act until after the local governing body shall have adopted a resolution finding that: (1) one or more deteriorated or deteriorating areas as defined in this act exist in such municipality; (2) the rehabilitation, conservation, redevelopment, or a combination thereof, of such area or areas is necessary in the interest of the public health, safety, morals or welfare of the residents of such municipality; and (3) there is need for an urban renewal agency to function in the municipality.

§ 50-2006. Urban renewal agency.

There is hereby created in each municipality an independent public body corporate and politic to be known as the “urban renewal agency” that was created by resolution as provided in section 50-2005, Idaho Code, before July 1, 2011, for the municipality; provided, that such agency shall not transact any business or exercise its powers hereunder until or unless: (1) the local governing body has made the findings prescribed in section 50-2005, Idaho Code; and provided further, that such agency created after July 1, 2011, shall not transact any business or exercise its powers provided for in this chapter until (2) a majority of qualified electors, voting in a citywide or countywide election depending on the municipality in which such agency is created, vote to authorize such agency to transact business and exercise its powers provided for in this chapter. If prior to July 1, 2011, the local governing body has made the findings prescribed in subsection (a)(1) of this section then such agency shall transact business and shall exercise its powers hereunder and is not subject to the requirements of subsection (a)(2) of this section.

Upon satisfaction of the requirements under subsection (a) of this section, the urban renewal agency is authorized to transact the business and exercise the powers hereunder by a board of commissioners to be established as follows:

Unless provided otherwise in this section, the mayor, by and with the advice and consent of the local governing body, shall appoint a board of commissioners of the urban renewal agency, which shall consist of not less than three (3) commissioners nor more than nine (9) commissioners. In the order of appointment, the mayor shall designate the number of commissioners to be appointed, and the term of each, provided that the original term of office of no more than two (2) commissioners shall expire in the same year. The commissioners shall serve for terms not to exceed five (5) years, from the date of appointment, except that all vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term.

For inefficiency or neglect of duty or misconduct in office, a commissioner may be removed by a majority vote of the local governing body only after a hearing and after he shall have been given a copy of the charges at least ten (10) days prior to such hearing and have had an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel. Any commission position that becomes vacant at a time other than the expiration of a term shall be filled by the mayor or chair of the board of county commissioners, if that is the local governing body, by and with the advice and consent of the local governing body, including the mayor, if applicable, and shall be filled for the unexpired term.

By enactment of an ordinance, the local governing body may appoint and designate from among its members to be members of the board of commissioners of the urban renewal agency, provided that such representation shall be less than a majority of the board of commissioners of the urban renewal agency of the members of the local governing body on and after July 1, 2017, in which case all the rights, powers, duties, privileges and immunities vested by the urban renewal law of 1965, and as amended, in an appointed board of commissioners, shall be vested in the local governing body, who shall, in all respects when acting as an urban renewal agency, be acting as an arm of state government, entirely separate and distinct from the municipality, to achieve, perform and accomplish the public purposes prescribed and provided by said urban renewal law of 1965, and as amended.
(4) By enactment of an ordinance, the local governing body may terminate the appointed board of commissioners and thereby appoint and designate itself as the board of commissioners of the urban renewal agency for not more than one (1) calendar year.

A commissioner shall receive no compensation for his services but shall be entitled to the necessary expenses, including traveling expenses, incurred in the discharge of his duties. Each commissioner shall hold office until his successor has been appointed and has qualified. A certificate of the appointment or reappointment of any commissioner shall be filed with the clerk of the municipality and such certificate shall be conclusive evidence of the due and proper appointment of such commissioner.

(5) By enactment of an ordinance, the local governing body may provide that the board of commissioners of the urban renewal agency shall be elected at an election held for such purpose on one (1) of the November dates provided in section 34-106, Idaho Code, and the ordinance may provide term limits for the commissioners. In this case, all the rights, powers, duties, privileges and immunities vested by the urban renewal law of 1965, and as amended, in an appointed board of commissioners, shall be vested in the elected board of commissioners of the urban renewal agency, who shall, in all respects when acting as an urban renewal agency, be acting as an arm of state government, entirely separate and distinct from the municipality, to achieve, perform and accomplish the public purposes prescribed and provided by said urban renewal law of 1965, and as amended. The provisions of chapter 66, title 67, Idaho Code, shall apply to elected commissioners and the county election law shall apply to the person running for commissioner as if they were running for county commissioner. In the event of a vacancy in an elected commissioner position, the replacement shall be appointed by the mayor or chair of the board of county commissioners, if that is the local governing body by and with the advice and consent of the local governing body, and shall be filled for the unexpired term.

(6) In all instances, a member of the board of commissioners of the urban renewal agency must be a resident of the county where the urban renewal agency is located or is doing business.

The powers of an urban renewal agency shall be exercised by the commissioners thereof. A majority of the commissioners shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of conducting business and exercising the powers of the agency and for all other purposes. Action may be taken by the agency upon a vote of a majority of the commissioners present, unless in any case the bylaws shall require a larger number.

The commissioners shall elect the chairman, cochairman or vice chairman for a term of one (1) year from among their members. An agency may employ an executive director, technical experts and such other agents and employees, permanent and temporary, as it may require, and determine their qualifications, duties and compensation. For such legal service as it may require, an agency may employ or retain its own counsel and legal staff. An agency authorized to transact business and exercise powers under this chapter shall file, with the local governing body, on or before March 31 of each year a report of its activities for the preceding calendar year, which report shall include a complete financial statement setting forth its assets, liabilities, income and operating expense as of the end of such calendar year. The agency shall be required to hold a public meeting to report these findings and take comments from the public. At the time of filing the report, the agency shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation in the community a notice to the effect that such report has been filed with the municipality and that the report is available for inspection during business hours in the office of the city clerk or county recorder and in the office of the agency.
(d) An urban renewal agency shall have the same fiscal year as a municipality and shall be subject to the same audit requirements as a municipality. An urban renewal agency shall be required to prepare and file with its local governing body an annual financial report and shall prepare, approve and adopt an annual budget for filing with the local governing body, for informational purposes. A budget means an annual estimate of revenues and expenses for the following fiscal year of the agency.

(e) An urban renewal agency shall comply with the public records law pursuant to chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code, open meetings law pursuant to chapter 2, title 74, Idaho Code, the ethics in government law pursuant to chapter 4, title 74, Idaho Code, and the competitive bidding provisions of chapter 28, title 67, Idaho Code.

§ 50-2007. Powers.

Every urban renewal agency shall have all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this act, including the following powers in addition to others herein granted:

To undertake and carry out urban renewal projects and related activities within its area of operation; and to make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of its powers under this act; and to disseminate slum clearance and urban renewal information;

To provide or to arrange or contract for the furnishing or repair by any person or agency, public or private, of services, privileges, works, streets, roads, public utilities or other facilities for or in connection with an urban renewal project; to install, construct, and reconstruct streets, utilities, parks, playgrounds, off-street parking facilities, public facilities, other buildings or public improvements; and any improvements necessary or incidental to a redevelopment project; and to agree to any conditions that it may deem reasonable and appropriate attached to federal financial assistance and imposed pursuant to federal law relating to the determination of prevailing salaries or wages or compliance with labor standards, in the undertaking or carrying out of an urban renewal project and related activities, and to include in any contract let in connection with such a project and related activities, provisions to fulfill such of said conditions as it may deem reasonable and appropriate;

Within its area of operation, to acquire by purchase, lease, option, gift, grant, bequest, devise, eminent domain or otherwise, any real property or personal property for its administrative purposes, together with any improvements thereon; to hold, improve, renovate, rehabilitate, clear or prepare for redevelopment any such property or buildings; to mortgage, pledge, hypothecate or otherwise encumber or dispose of any real property; to insure or provide for the insurance of any real or personal property or operations of the municipality against any risks or hazards, including the power to pay premiums on any such insurance; and to enter into any contracts necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act: Provided however, that no statutory provision with respect to the acquisition, clearance or disposition of property by public bodies shall restrict a municipality or other public body exercising powers hereunder in the exercise of such functions with respect to an urban renewal project and related activities, unless the legislature shall specifically so state;

With the approval of the local governing body, (1) prior to approval of an urban renewal plan, or approval of any modifications of the plan, to acquire real property in an urban renewal area, demolish and remove any structures on the property, and pay all costs related to the acquisition, demolition, or removal, including any administrative or relocation expenses; and (2) to assume the responsibility to bear any loss that may arise as the result of the exercise of authority under this subsection in the event that the real property is not made part of the urban renewal project;

To invest any urban renewal funds held in reserves or sinking funds or any such funds not required for immediate disbursement, in property or securities in which savings banks may legally invest funds subject to their control; to redeem such bonds as have been issued pursuant to section 50-2012, Idaho Code, at the redemption price established therein or to purchase such bonds at less than redemption price, all such bonds so redeemed or purchased to be canceled;

To borrow money and to apply for and accept advances, loans, grants, contributions and any other form of financial assistance from the federal government, the state, county, or other public body, or from any sources, public or private, for the purposes of this act, and to give such security as may be required and to enter into and carry out contracts or agreements in connection therewith; and to include in any contract for financial assistance with the federal government for or with respect to an urban renewal project and related activities such conditions imposed pursuant to federal laws as the municipality may deem reasonable and appropriate and which are not inconsistent with the purposes of this act;

Within its area of operation, to make or have made all surveys and plans necessary to the carrying out of the purposes of this act and to contract with any person, public or private, in making and carrying out such plans and to adopt or approve, modify and amend such plans, which plans may include, but are not limited to: (1) plans for carrying out a program of voluntary compulsory repair and rehabilitation of buildings and improvements, (2) plans for the enforcement of state and local laws, codes and regulations relating to the use of land and the use and occupancy of buildings and improvements and to the compulsory repair, rehabilitation, demolition, or removal of buildings and improvements, and (3) appraisals, title searches, surveys, studies, and other plans and work necessary to prepare for the undertaking of urban renewal projects and related activities; and to develop, test, and report methods and techniques, and carry out demonstrations and other activities, for the prevention and the elimination of slums and urban blight and developing and demonstrating new or improved means of providing housing for families and persons of low income and to apply for, accept and utilize grants of funds from the federal government for such purposes;

To prepare plans for and assist in the relocation of persons, including individuals, families, business concerns, nonprofit organizations and others displaced from an urban renewal area, and notwithstanding any statute of this state to make relocation payments to or with respect to such persons for which reimbursement or compensation is not otherwise made, including the making of such payments financed by the federal government;

To exercise all or any part or combination of powers herein granted;

In addition to its powers under subsection (b) of this section, an agency may construct foundations, platforms, and other like structural forms necessary for the provision or utilization of air rights sites for buildings and to be used for residential, commercial, industrial, and other uses contemplated by the urban renewal plan, and to provide utilities to the development site; and

To use, lend or invest funds obtained from the federal government for the purposes of this act if allowable under federal laws or regulations.

§ 50-2008. Preparation and approval of plan for urban renewal project.

An urban renewal project for an urban renewal area shall not be planned or initiated unless the local governing body has, by resolution, determined such area to be a deteriorated area or a deteriorating area or a combination thereof and designated such area as appropriate for an urban renewal project.

An urban renewal agency may itself prepare or cause to be prepared an urban renewal plan, or any person or agency, public or private, may submit such a plan to an urban renewal agency. Prior to its approval of an urban renewal project, the local governing body shall submit such plan to the planning commission of the municipality, if any, for review and recommendations as to its conformity with the general plan for the development of the municipality as a whole. The planning commission shall submit its written recommendations with respect to the proposed urban renewal plan to the local governing body within sixty (60) days after receipt of the plan for review. Upon receipt of the recommendations of the planning commission, or if no recommendations are received within said sixty (60) days, then without such recommendations, the local governing body may proceed with the hearing on the proposed urban renewal project prescribed by subsection (c) hereof.

The local governing body shall hold a public hearing on an urban renewal project, after public notice thereof by publication in a newspaper having a general circulation in the area of operation of the municipality. The notice shall describe the time, date, place and purpose of the hearing, shall generally identify the urban renewal area covered by the plan, and shall outline the general scope of the urban renewal project under consideration.

Following such hearing, the local governing body may approve an urban renewal project and the plan therefor if it finds that (1) a feasible method exists for the location of families who will be displaced from the urban renewal area in decent, safe and sanitary dwelling accommodations within their means and without undue hardship to such families; (2) the urban renewal plan conforms to the general plan of the municipality as a whole; (3) the urban renewal plan gives due consideration to the provision of adequate park and recreational areas and facilities that may be desirable for neighborhood improvement, with special consideration for the health, safety and welfare of children residing in the general vicinity of the site covered by the plan; and (4) the urban renewal plan will afford maximum opportunity, consistent with the sound needs of the municipality as a whole, for the rehabilitation or redevelopment of the urban renewal area by private enterprise: Provided, that if the urban renewal area consists of an area of open land to be acquired by the urban renewal agency, such area shall not be so acquired unless (1) if it is to be developed for residential uses, the local governing body shall determine that a shortage of housing of sound standards and design which is decent, safe and sanitary exists in the municipality; that the need for housing accommodations has been or will be increased as a result of the clearance of slums in other areas; that the conditions of blight in the area and the shortage of decent, safe and sanitary housing cause or contribute to an increase in and spread of disease and crime and constitute a menace to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare; and that the acquisition of the area for residential uses is an integral part of and essential to the program of the municipality, or (2) if it is to be developed for nonresidential uses, the local governing body shall determine that such nonresidential uses are necessary and appropriate to facilitate the proper growth and development of the community in accordance with sound planning standards and local community objectives, which acquisition may require the exercise of governmental action, as provided in this act, because of defective or unusual conditions of title, diversity of ownership, tax delinquency, improper subdivisions, outmoded street patterns, deterioration of site, economic disuse, unsuitable topography or faulty lot layouts, the need for the correlation of the area with other areas of a municipality by streets and modern traffic requirements, or any combination of such factors or other conditions which retard development of the area.

An urban renewal plan may be modified at any time: Provided that if modified after the lease or sale by the urban renewal agency of real property in the urban renewal project area, such modification may be conditioned upon such approval of the owner, lessee or successor in interest as the urban renewal agency may deem advisable and in any event shall be subject to such rights at law or in equity as a lessee or purchaser, or his successor or successors in interest, may be entitled to assert.

Upon the approval by the local governing body of an urban renewal plan or of any modification thereof, such plan or modification shall be deemed to be in full force and effect for the respective urban renewal area, and the urban renewal agency may then cause such plan or modification to be carried out in accordance with its terms.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this act, where the local governing body certifies that an area is in need of redevelopment or rehabilitation as a result of a flood, fire, hurricane, earthquake, storm, or other catastrophe respecting which the governor of the state has certified the need for disaster assistance under 42 U.S.C. section 5121, or other federal law, the local governing body may approve an urban renewal plan and an urban renewal project with respect to such area without regard to the provisions of subsection (d) of this section and the provisions of this section requiring a general plan for the municipality and a public hearing on the urban renewal project.

Any urban renewal plan containing a revenue allocation financing provision shall include the information set forth in section 50-2905, Idaho Code.

§ 50-2009. Neighborhood and community-wide plans.

An urban renewal agency or any public body authorized to perform planning work may prepare a general neighborhood renewal plan for urban renewal areas which may be of such scope that urban renewal activities may have to be carried out in stages over an estimated period of up to ten (10) years. Such plan may include, but is not limited to, a preliminary plan which (1) outlines the urban renewal activities proposed for the area involved, (2) provides a framework for the preparation of urban renewal plans, and (3) indicates generally the land uses, population density, building coverage, prospective requirements for rehabilitation and improvement of property and portions of the area contemplated for clearance and redevelopment. A general neighborhood renewal plan shall, in the determination of the local governing body, conform to the general plan of the locality as a whole and the workable program of the municipality.

A municipality or any public body authorized to perform planning work may prepare or complete a community-wide plan or program for urban renewal which shall conform to the general plan for the development of the municipality as a whole and may include, but is not limited to, identification of slum, blighted, deteriorated or deteriorating areas, measurement of blight, determination of resources needed and available to renew such areas, identification of potential project areas and types of action contemplated, and scheduling of urban renewal activities.

Authority is hereby vested in every municipality to prepare, to adopt and to revise from time to time, a general plan for the physical development of the municipality as a whole (giving due regard to the environs and metropolitan surroundings), to establish and maintain a planning commission for such purpose and related municipal planning activities, and to make available and to appropriate necessary funds therefor.

§ 50-2010. Acquisition of property.

An urban renewal agency shall have the right to acquire by negotiation or condemnation any interest in real property, including a fee simple title thereto, which it may deem necessary for or in connection with an urban renewal project and related activities under this act. An urban renewal agency may exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner now or which may be hereafter provided by any other statutory provisions for the exercise of the power of eminent domain. Property already devoted to a public use may be acquired in like manner: Provided, that no real property belonging to the United States, the state, or any political subdivision of the state, may be acquired without its consent.

In any proceeding to fix or assess compensation for damages for the taking or damaging of property, or any interest therein, through the exercise of the power of eminent domain or condemnation, evidence or testimony bearing upon the following matters shall be admissible and shall be considered in fixing such compensation or damages, in addition to evidence or testimony otherwise admissible:

any use, condition, occupancy, or operation of such property, which is unlawful or violative of, or subject to elimination, abatement, prohibition, or correction under, any law or any ordinance or regulatory measure of the state, county, municipality, other political subdivision, or any agency thereof, in which such property is located, as being unsafe, substandard, insanitary or otherwise contrary to the public health, safety, or welfare;

the effect on the value of such property, of any such use, condition, occupancy, or operation, or of the elimination, abatement, prohibition, or correction of any such use, condition, occupancy, or operation.

The foregoing testimony and evidence shall be admissible notwithstanding that no action has been taken by any public body or public officer toward the abatement, prohibition, elimination or correction of any such use, condition, occupancy, or operation. Testimony or evidence that any public body or public officer charged with the duty or authority so to do has rendered, made or issued any judgment, decree, determination or order for the abatement, prohibition, elimination or correction of any such use, condition, occupancy, or operation shall be admissible and shall be prima facie evidence of the existence and character of such use, condition or operation.

§ 50-2011. Disposal of property in urban renewal area.

An urban renewal agency may sell, lease, or otherwise transfer real property or any interest therein acquired by it for an urban renewal project, and may enter into contracts with respect thereto, in an urban renewal area for residential, recreational, commercial, industrial, educational or other uses or for public use, or may retain such property or interest for public use, in accordance with the urban renewal plan, subject to such covenants, conditions and restrictions, including covenants running with the land, as it may deem to be necessary or desirable to assist in preventing the development or spread of future slums or blighted areas or to otherwise carry out the purposes of this act: Provided, that such sale, lease, other transfer, or retention, and any agreement relating thereto, may be made only after the approval of the urban renewal plan by the local governing body. The purchasers or lessees and their successors and assigns shall be obligated to devote such real property only to the uses specified in the urban renewal plan, and may be obligated to comply with such other requirements as the urban renewal agency may determine to be in the public interest, including the obligation to begin within a reasonable time any improvements on such real property required by the urban renewal plan. Such real property or interest shall be sold, leased, otherwise transferred, or retained at not less than its fair value for uses in accordance with the urban renewal plan except property disposed of by it to the community or any other public body which property must be disposed of pursuant to the provisions of subsection (f) of section 50-2015, Idaho Code, even though such fair value may be less than the cost of acquiring and preparing the property for redevelopment. In determining the fair value of real property for uses in accordance with the urban renewal plan, an urban renewal agency shall take into account and give consideration to the uses provided in such plan; the restrictions upon, and the covenants, conditions and obligations assumed by the purchaser or lessee or by the urban renewal agency retaining the property; and the objectives of such plan for the prevention of the recurrence of slum or blighted areas. The urban renewal agency in any instrument of conveyance to a private purchaser or lessee may provide that such purchaser or lessee shall be without power to sell, lease or otherwise transfer the real property without the prior written consent of the urban renewal agency until he has completed the construction of any or all improvements which he has obligated himself to construct thereon. Real property acquired by an urban renewal agency which, in accordance with the provisions of the urban renewal plan, is to be transferred, shall be transferred as rapidly as feasible in the public interest consistent with the carrying out of the provisions of the urban renewal plan. Any contract for such transfer and the urban renewal plan (or such part or parts of such contract or plan as the urban renewal agency may determine) may be recorded in the land records of the county in such manner as to afford actual or constructive notice thereof.

An urban renewal agency may dispose of real property in an urban renewal area to private persons only under such reasonable competitive bidding procedures as it shall prescribe or as hereinafter provided in this subsection. An urban renewal agency may, by public notice by publication in a newspaper having a general circulation in the community (thirty (30) days prior to the execution of any contract to sell, lease or otherwise transfer real property and prior to the delivery of any instrument of conveyance with respect thereto under the provisions of this section) invite proposals from and make available all pertinent information to private redevelopers or any persons interested in undertaking to redevelop or rehabilitate an urban renewal area, or any part thereof. Such notice shall identify the area, or portion thereof, and shall state that proposals shall be made by those interested within thirty (30) days after the date of publication of said notice, and that such further information as is available may be obtained at such office as shall be designated in said notice. The urban renewal agency shall consider all such redevelopment of [or] rehabilitation proposals and the financial and legal ability of the persons making such proposals to carry them out, and may negotiate with any persons for proposals for the purchase, lease or other transfer of any real property acquired by the agency in the urban renewal area. The urban renewal agency may accept such proposal as it deems to be in the public interest and in furtherance of the purposes of this act. The agency may execute such contract in accordance with the provisions of subsection (a) and deliver deeds, leases and other instruments and take all steps necessary to effectuate such contract.

An urban renewal agency may temporarily operate and maintain real property acquired by it in an urban renewal area for or in connection with an urban renewal project pending the disposition of the property as authorized in this act, without regard to the provisions of subsection (a) above, for such uses and purposes as may be deemed desirable even though not in conformity with the urban renewal plan.

Any real property acquired pursuant to section 50-2007(d)[, Idaho Code,] may be disposed of without regard to other provisions of this section if the local governing body has consented to the disposal.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this act, and notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, land in an urban renewal project area designated under the urban renewal plan for industrial or commercial uses may be disposed of to any public body or nonprofit corporation for subsequent disposition as promptly as practicable by the public body or corporation for redevelopment in accordance with the urban renewal plan, and only the purchaser from or lessee of the public body or corporation, and their assignees, shall be required to assume the obligation of beginning the building of improvements within a reasonable time. Any disposition of land to a nonprofit corporation under this subsection shall be made at its fair value for uses in accordance with the urban renewal plan. Any disposition of land to a public body under this subsection shall be made pursuant to the provisions of subsection (f) of section 50-2015, Idaho Code.